test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-3lex_cokkiittid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - cokkiittiđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    cokkiittiđ+V+Inf: cokkiittiđ
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cokkiittâm
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: cokkiittah
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cokkit
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: cokkiitteen
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: cokkitvettee
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: cokkiittává
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: cokkiittep
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: cokkitvetteđ
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: cokkiitteh
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: cokkiittim
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: cokkiittih
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: cokkiittij
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [cokkiittáim, cokkiittááim]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [cokkiittááid, cokkiittáid]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [cokkiittáin, cokkiittááin]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: cokkiittijm
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: cokkiittijd
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: cokkiittii
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: cokkiittiččim
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: cokkiittiččih
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: cokkiittičij
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Du1: [cokkiittiččijm, cokkiittiččiijm]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Du2: [cokkiittiččijd, cokkiittiččiijd]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Du3: [cokkiittiččijn, cokkiittiččiijn]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: cokkiittiččijm
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: cokkiittiččijd
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: cokkiittiččii
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: cokkiittižžeem
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: cokkiittižžeeh
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: cokkiittiš
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Du1: cokkiittižžeen
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Du2: cokkiittišvettee
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Du3: cokkiittižává
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: cokkiittižžep
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: cokkiittišvetted
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: cokkiittižeh
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: cokkiittum
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: cokkit
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: cokkiittus
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: cokkiittoon
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: cokkiittee
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: cokkiittus
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: cokkiittop
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: cokkiittiđ
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: cokkiittus
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: cokkit
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: cokkiittâm
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: cokkiittiččii
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: cokkiittižžii
    cokkiittiđ+V+PrsPrc: [cokkiitteijee, cokkiittijjee]
    cokkiittiđ+V+PrfPrc: cokkiittâm
    cokkiittiđ+V+Actio: cokkiittem
    cokkiittiđ+V+Actio+Ess: cokkitmin
    cokkiittiđ+V+Actio+Loc: cokkitmist
    cokkiittiđ+V+Actio+Ill: cokkitmân
    cokkiittiđ+V+Actio+Com: cokkitdijn
    cokkiittiđ+V+VAbess: cokkithánnáá

  Verb - kulluuttiđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    kulluuttiđ+V+Inf: kulluuttiđ
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kulluuttâm
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kulluuttah
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kullut
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kulluutteen
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kullutvettee
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kulluuttává
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kulluuttep
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kullutvetteđ
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kulluutteh
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kulluuttim
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kulluuttih
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kulluuttij
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [kulluuttáim, kulluuttááim]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [kulluuttáid, kulluuttááid]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [kulluuttáin, kulluuttááin]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kulluuttijm
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kulluuttijd
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kulluuttii
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kulluuttiččim
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kulluuttiččih
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kulluuttičij
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Du1: [kulluuttiččijm, kulluuttiččiijm]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Du2: [kulluuttiččijd, kulluuttiččiijd]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Du3: [kulluuttiččijn, kulluuttiččiijn]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kulluuttiččijm
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kulluuttiččijd
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kulluuttiččii
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kulluuttižžeem
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kulluuttižžeeh
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kulluuttiš
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Du1: kulluuttižžeen
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Du2: kulluuttišvettee
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Du3: kulluuttižává
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kulluuttižžep
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kulluuttišvetted
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kulluuttižeh
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: kulluuttum
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kullut
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kulluuttus
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kulluuttoon
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kulluuttee
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kulluuttus
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kulluuttop
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kulluuttiđ
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kulluuttus
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kullut
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kulluuttâm
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kulluuttiččii
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: kulluuttižžii
    kulluuttiđ+V+PrsPrc: [kulluutteijee, kulluuttijjee]
    kulluuttiđ+V+PrfPrc: kulluuttâm
    kulluuttiđ+V+Actio: kulluuttem
    kulluuttiđ+V+Actio+Ess: kullutmin
    kulluuttiđ+V+Actio+Loc: kullutmist
    kulluuttiđ+V+Actio+Ill: kullutmân
    kulluuttiđ+V+Actio+Com: kullutdijn
    kulluuttiđ+V+VAbess: kulluthánnáá

  Verb - cokkiittiđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    cokkiittiđ+V+Inf: cokkiittiđ
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cokkiittâm
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: cokkiittah
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cokkit
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: cokkiitteen
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: cokkitvettee
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: cokkiittává
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: cokkiittep
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: cokkitvetteđ
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: cokkiitteh
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: cokkiittim
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: cokkiittih
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: cokkiittij
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [cokkiittáim, cokkiittááim]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [cokkiittááid, cokkiittáid]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [cokkiittáin, cokkiittááin]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: cokkiittijm
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: cokkiittijd
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: cokkiittii
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: cokkiittiččim
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: cokkiittiččih
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: cokkiittičij
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Du1: [cokkiittiččijm, cokkiittiččiijm]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Du2: [cokkiittiččijd, cokkiittiččiijd]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Du3: [cokkiittiččijn, cokkiittiččiijn]
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: cokkiittiččijm
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: cokkiittiččijd
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: cokkiittiččii
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: cokkiittižžeem
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: cokkiittižžeeh
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: cokkiittiš
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Du1: cokkiittižžeen
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Du2: cokkiittišvettee
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Du3: cokkiittižává
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: cokkiittižžep
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: cokkiittišvetted
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: cokkiittižeh
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: cokkiittum
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: cokkit
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: cokkiittus
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: cokkiittoon
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: cokkiittee
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: cokkiittus
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: cokkiittop
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: cokkiittiđ
    cokkiittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: cokkiittus
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: cokkit
    cokkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: cokkiittâm
    cokkiittiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: cokkiittiččii
    cokkiittiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: cokkiittižžii
    cokkiittiđ+V+PrsPrc: [cokkiitteijee, cokkiittijjee]
    cokkiittiđ+V+PrfPrc: cokkiittâm
    cokkiittiđ+V+Actio: cokkiittem
    cokkiittiđ+V+Actio+Ess: cokkitmin
    cokkiittiđ+V+Actio+Loc: cokkitmist
    cokkiittiđ+V+Actio+Ill: cokkitmân
    cokkiittiđ+V+Actio+Com: cokkitdijn
    cokkiittiđ+V+VAbess: cokkithánnáá

  Verb - kulluuttiđ: # MLO, checked; check also Imprt, ConNeg -forms and Ill
    kulluuttiđ+V+Inf: kulluuttiđ
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kulluuttâm
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kulluuttah
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kullut
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kulluutteen
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kullutvettee
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kulluuttává
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kulluuttep
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kullutvetteđ
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kulluutteh
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kulluuttim
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kulluuttih
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kulluuttij
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [kulluuttáim, kulluuttááim]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [kulluuttáid, kulluuttááid]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [kulluuttáin, kulluuttááin]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kulluuttijm
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kulluuttijd
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kulluuttii
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kulluuttiččim
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kulluuttiččih
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kulluuttičij
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Du1: [kulluuttiččijm, kulluuttiččiijm]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Du2: [kulluuttiččijd, kulluuttiččiijd]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Du3: [kulluuttiččijn, kulluuttiččiijn]
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kulluuttiččijm
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kulluuttiččijd
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kulluuttiččii
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kulluuttižžeem
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kulluuttižžeeh
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kulluuttiš
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Du1: kulluuttižžeen
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Du2: kulluuttišvettee
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Du3: kulluuttižává
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kulluuttižžep
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kulluuttišvetted
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kulluuttižeh
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: kulluuttum
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kullut
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kulluuttus
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kulluuttoon
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kulluuttee
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kulluuttus
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kulluuttop
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kulluuttiđ
    kulluuttiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kulluuttus
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kullut
    kulluuttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kulluuttâm
    kulluuttiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kulluuttiččii
    kulluuttiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: kulluuttižžii
    kulluuttiđ+V+PrsPrc: [kulluutteijee, kulluuttijjee]
    kulluuttiđ+V+PrfPrc: kulluuttâm
    kulluuttiđ+V+Actio: kulluuttem
    kulluuttiđ+V+Actio+Ess: kullutmin
    kulluuttiđ+V+Actio+Loc: kullutmist
    kulluuttiđ+V+Actio+Ill: kullutmân
    kulluuttiđ+V+Actio+Com: kullutdijn
    kulluuttiđ+V+VAbess: kulluthánnáá
